Utah statutes.
17-33-12.   Reciprocal agreements for benefit of system -- Cooperation by director with other governmental agencies.

(1) The county may enter into reciprocal agreements, upon such terms as may be agreed upon, for the use of equipment, materials, facilities, and services with any public agency or body for purposes deemed of benefit to the public personnel system.

(2)  The director may cooperate with other governmental agencies charged with public personnel administration in conducting personnel tests, recruiting personnel, training personnel, establishing lists from which eligibles shall be certified for appointment and for the interchange of personnel and their benefits.



Enacted by Chapter 81, 1981 General Session

